Alabama, session 2026rs, SB88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
38 Section 1. Section 16-1-4, Code of Alabama 1975, is
39 amended to read as follows:
40 "§16-1-2.4
41 (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
42 contrary, the governing board of each educational institution
43 or state educational institution, as defined in Section
44 41-4-400(d), may on behalf of the State of Alabama do any or
45 all of the following in relation to that institution:
46 (1) Acquire lands by purchase, condemnation, or
47 otherwise.
48 (2) Plan for the construction, repair, remodeling,
49 enlargement, renovation, furnishing, refurnishing,
50 improvement, or relocation of buildings, structures, and
51 facilities.
52 (3) Set policies, procedures, and guidelines for the
53 design, construction, renovation, equipment, furnishing,
54 maintenance, and improvement of all property now owned or
55 hereafter acquired.
56 (4) Construct, repair, equip, remodel, enlarge,
Page 2

(4) Construct, repair, equip, remodel, enlarge,
SB88 INTRODUCED
57 renovate, furnish, refurnish, improve, and locate buildings,
58 structures, and facilities.
59 (5) Enter into contracts or consult with architects,
60 engineers, contractors, suppliers, and others as needed to
61 perform any of the functions provided for in this subsection.
62 (6) Receive any monies, land, or equipment donated,
63 appropriated, or otherwise acquired by it for the purposes
64 provided for in this subsection.
65 (7) Charge and provide for collection of user fees for
66 its services. The fees established shall take into
67 consideration the costs of the governing board incurred under
68 this section.
69 (8) Make and adopt all necessary rules, regulations,
70 and plans for its own guidance and for the proper conduct of
71 the duties imposed upon it.
72 (9) Review and approve or disapprove all proposed
73 construction, renovation, or improvement projects for
74 constructability, durability, and maintainability and to
75 ensure the efficient use and availability of funds.
76 (10) Review and administer all design and construction
77 contracts for facilities as provided for in this subsection.
78 (11) Review all emergency project declarations and to
79 aid in the timely execution of emergency projects.
80 (12) Hire architects, inspectors, and any other
81 personnel necessary for the purposes provided for in this
82 subsection or the duties assigned under this section.
83 (b)(1)a. At any K-12 school or at any four-year public
84 institution of higher education, any capital improvement
Page 3

institution of higher education, any capital improvement
SB88 INTRODUCED
85 project or any alterations, additions, repair, or maintenance
86 of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems or any
87 alterations, additions, repair, or maintenance of a roof shall
88 not be subject to approval by the Division of Construction
89 Management within the Department of Finance;, provided, that
90 the estimated cost of the project after design completion is
91 certified by a licensed architect or licensed engineer to be
92 no more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000).
93 b.1. For any project exempt from approval pursuant to
94 paragraph a., the governing body of the K-12 school or
95 four-year public institution of higher education shall submit
96 documents to the Division of Construction Management for the
97 sole purpose of review and inspection for compliance with the
98 Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12112 et seq.,
99 and rules and regulations adopted thereunder, for fire safety
100 and life safety compliance, and for issuance of written
101 recommendations to the school or institution at no cost to the
102 school or institution or the governing body for the school or
103 institution.
104 2. The Division of Construction Management shall issue
105 its written recommendations no later than 30 days following
106 receipt of documentation pursuant to subparagraph 1. If the
107 division is unable to issue recommendations within the 30-day
108 period following receipt of documentation, the division, prior
109 to the expiration of the 30-day period, shall issue to the
110 party that submitted the documentation a written notice
111 explaining the reasons for the delay, and shall issue the
112 recommendations no later than 45 days following the original
Page 4

recommendations no later than 45 days following the original
SB88 INTRODUCED
113 receipt of documentation pursuant to subparagraph 1.
114 3. Recommendations issued by the division pursuant to
115 this paragraph shall be maintained by the division as public
116 writings for purposes of Article 3 of Chapter 12 of Title 36.
117 c.b. The Division of Construction Management, in
118 consultation with the State Department of Education, shall
119 develop and distribute forms relating to projects subject to
120 this subdivision for use by local boards of education. The
121 division shall ensure that the use of these forms alone does
122 not require use of Division of Construction Management
123 services for projects subject to this subdivision, except for
124 the issuance of recommendations pursuant to paragraph b.
125 d. For purposes of this subdivision, "fire safety and
126 life safety compliance" means compliance with those provisions
127 of the uniform minimum building standards code adopted by the
128 Division of Construction Management pursuant to law that
129 relate to risk of electrical or fire hazards, risk of injury,
130 or illness.
131 (2) Any repair or maintenance project with an estimated
132 cost certified by a licensed architect or licensed engineer to
133 be no more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
134 ($750,000); any repair or maintenance of heating, ventilation,
135 and air conditioning systems; and any roofing repair or
136 maintenance shall not be subject to approval by the governing
137 board of an educational institution or state educational
138 institution.
139 (c) All powers, authority, and jurisdiction of the
140 Division of Construction Management or the former Building
Page 5

Division of Construction Management or the former Building
SB88 INTRODUCED
141 Commission relating to any educational institution or state
142 educational institution, including, but not limited to, those
143 authorities currently established in Sections 16-1-2.2,
144 16-16-10(o)(2) and (p), 39-2-2(f)(1), 41-9-243, and
145 41-16-72(3)a. through f., which were previously transferred to
146 the Division of Construction Management within the Department
147 of Finance, are transferred to the governing board of that
148 institution;. provided, that theThe Division of Construction
149 Management shall retain its authority to adopt uniform minimum
150 building standards code for the construction and renovation of
151 facilities at any educational institution or state educational
152 institution."
153 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
154 1, 2026.
Page 6